Rhode Island statutes. Title 47 Weights and Measures
Chapter 1 Duties of Director of Labor and Training

47-1-1.
Standards received from United States as standards for towns.

The weights, measures, and balances received from the United States, and now in the custody of the director of the department of labor and training, and such new weights, measures, and balances as shall be received from the United States as standard weights, measures, and balances in addition thereto or in renewal thereof, shall be the authorized standards by which all town standards of weights and measures shall be tried, proved, and sealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1069, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

47-1-1

.

47-1-1.1.
Certification of local sealer required — Training provision — Renewal and revocation of certificate.

The director of the department of labor and training shall require sealers appointed by a city or town to obtain an annual certificate of training. The certificate of training shall cause a sealer of weights and measures to be “certified”. The requirements for the certificate of training shall be set by the director of the department of labor and training in accordance with the standards of the metrology laboratory which shall be certified and have weights and measures standards traceable to the national institute of standards and technology, United States Department of Commerce in Washington, D.C. Appropriate training of appointees from city and town municipalities will be provided by a certified meteorologist from the department of labor and training with the assistance of professional persons qualified in the field of weights and measures, and the national training program sponsored by the National Conference on Weights and Measures. Once certified, sealers shall maintain their status by complying with the rules and regulations promulgated and may be assigned by the director of the department of labor and training or his or her agent to assist in the enforcement of applicable laws until such time as the director cancels the assignment. A certified sealer assigned to a municipality by the director of labor and training shall be responsible for the testing and sealing of weighing and measuring apparatus and said compensation as prescribed by §

47-1-5.1

. Municipal sealers with tenure of no less than four (4) years shall receive a certificate of training for one year upon passage of this section.

The director of the department of labor and training is authorized and empowered to promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of this section, and to set criteria by rules and regulations for the revocation of any such training certificate for cause.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 90, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 297, § 1.

47-1-2.
Custody and maintenance of state standards — Testing of standards.

The director of the department of labor and training shall have the exclusive custody and control of the standards so received by the state from the United States, which standards shall be kept in a suitable fireproof place to be provided by the state. The director shall have the oversight of all the standards furnished by the state to the various towns and cities, and shall keep a complete list of the standards and shall see that they are kept in good order and repair. The director shall also keep the standards belonging to the state, furnished by the United States, in perfect order, and shall keep a complete list of the standards, and shall take a receipt for the standards from his or her successor in office.

The director may, if he or she deems it desirable, and shall, upon request by private industry and for law enforcement agencies, test any weights, measures, instruments, or mechanical devices of any kind used or intended to be used in standardizing the production of any manufactured article by controlling processes or by determining the dimensions, proportions, or properties of materials or products, in determining wages or compensation for labor performed, in determining the dimensions or capacity of any tank, can, or other container, or in determining the accuracy of any automatic weighing or measuring device. When any weight, measure, instrument, or mechanical device has been tested and found correct by the director, the director may seal the same. If the director finds it inaccurate, the director may, in his or her discretion, either condemn it or the director may furnish the owner or user with a certificate indicating the amount and direction of any errors found by him or her. This section shall not give to the director or his or her inspectors the power to seal any of the devices which are required by law to be sealed by local sealers.

The director of the department of labor and training shall by regulation establish a fee schedule for services rendered under this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1069, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

47-1-2

; P.L. 1976, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 64.

47-1-3.
Sets of standards furnished to cities and towns.

The director of the department of labor and training shall furnish a set of standards of weights, measures, and balances, at such a cost as the director may deem proper, to each city or town that in the director’s judgment shall not have a suitable set, the cost to be paid for by the state on the order of the state controller on the general treasurer, the set to consist as follows: one even balance of a capacity not less than one hundred pounds (100 lbs.); one brass yard gauge; five (5) iron dry measures, one each of the following capacities: one-half (1/2) bushel, one peck, one-half (1/2) peck, two (2) quarts, and one quart; six (6) iron wine measures, one each of the following capacities: one gallon, one-half (1/2) gallon, one quart, one pint, one-half (1/2) pint, and one gill; five (5) iron ring weights, avoirdupois standard, one each as follows: fifty pounds (50 lbs.), twenty-five pounds (25 lbs.), twenty pounds (20 lbs.), ten pounds (10 lbs.), and five pounds (5 lbs.); ten (10) brass weights, avoirdupois standard, one each as follows: four pounds (4 lbs.), two pounds (2 lbs.), one pound (1 lb.), eight ounces (8 oz.), four ounces (4 oz.), one ounce (1 oz.), one-half ounce (1/2 oz.), one-quarter ounce (1/4 oz.), one-eighth ounce (1/8 oz.), one-sixteenth ounce (1/16 oz.); together with a suitable case or cabinet to contain the set.

The director shall also furnish each town and city, at the expense of the town or city, a portable even balance scale, with a set of weights and measures, to be used by the town or city sealers in the discharge of their duties as hereinafter provided.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1069, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

47-1-3

.

47-1-4.
Annual inventory of local standards.

The sealers of the different towns and cities shall make an inventory of weights, measures, and balances furnished by the state and their condition, on a blank prepared for that purpose, in the month of October of each year, and shall forward the inventory to the director of labor and training.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1069, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

47-1-4

.

47-1-5.
Inspection of mercantile weights and measures — Reports of inaccuracy.

The director of the department of labor and training may, in the discharge of his or her duties, inspect the weights, measures, and balances of any person or persons, which are used for selling any goods, wares, merchandise, or other commodities, or for public weighing in any town or city in this state, and if he or she finds the weights, measures, or balances to be inaccurate, he or she shall forthwith inform the mayor of the city or the president of the town council, as the case may be, and the mayor or president shall at once call the attention of the town or city sealer thereto.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1069, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

47-1-5

.

47-1-5.1.
Fees and compensation of director of labor and training.

The director of the department of labor and training shall, in any town or city without a town or city sealer, or in a case where a sealer is not available or his or her deputy, or when sufficient equipment has not been provided for by the town or city for a sealer to properly perform his or her duties, for a period not to exceed three (3) months in any one year, test and/or approve any weighing, measuring, or balancing apparatus, and shall receive compensation for testing and/or approving as stated herein. Every mechanical, electronic, or other scale with NETP certification with a capacity of less than thirty-five (35) pounds a fee of twelve dollars ($12.00); for every scale used for the retail sale of precious metals thirty dollars ($30.00); for every mechanical, electronic, or other scale with NETP certification with a capacity of thirty-five (35) pounds to three hundred (300) pounds a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00); for every platform scale with a capacity of three hundred (300) pounds to five thousand (5,000) pounds a fee of twenty-four dollars ($24.00); and for every platform scale with a capacity over five thousand (5,000) pounds a fee of thirty-six dollars ($36.00) per hour. If any of the scales, balances or gasoline measuring devices with NETP certification are found to be incorrect, then they shall be so marked and their use forbidden until such time as the devices meet the requirements of that current year edition of NIST Handbook 44. Scales or balances not meeting class standards, as those often used to weigh people or scales for approximating weight, can be checked and the fees shall be the same as herein provided for same weight capacities. For the testing and/or approving of gasoline measuring devices there shall be a fee of eighteen dollars ($18.00) per test per meter; in the case of a multi-grade dispenser a fee of twelve dollars ($12.00) shall be charged to verify the price computation mechanism.

The director of the department of labor and training shall authorize and direct the testing and/or approving of the apparatus stated herein, from time to time as in the director’s judgment it may be deemed necessary to prevent fraud or deception.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 45, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 11.

47-1-6.
Records and reports of director.

The director of the department of labor and training shall keep a record in detail of the towns and cities visited by him or her in the performance of his or her duties under this title; and of the weights, measures, and balances tested and sealed by him or her; and the director shall include this record in the annual report.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1069, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

47-1-6

; P.L. 1984, ch. 127, § 1.